Idaho, session 2025, H0402.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 49-305, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-305. INSTRUCTION PERMITS -- COMMERCIAL LEARNER'S PERMIT -- TEMPO-
RARY LICENSES -- MOTORCYCLE ENDORSEMENT INSTRUCTION PERMIT. (1) Upon pas-
sage of the required knowledge tests appropriate for the vehicle being oper-
ated, the department may issue a commercial learner's permit for the type of
vehicle(s) the person will be operating or a class D instruction permit for a
class D motor vehicle. Applicants, while in immediate possession of a com-
mercial learner's permit, may drive a motor vehicle upon on the highways for
a period of up to one (1) year, and applicants with a class D instruction per-
mit may drive a motor vehicle upon on the highways for a period of up to one
hundred eighty (180) days or as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection
for certain class D instruction permits. That person must be accompanied by
an adult driver eighteen (18) years of age or older who holds a valid driver's
license appropriate for the vehicle being operated and who is actually oc-
cupying a seat beside the driver. Unless otherwise provided, a class D in-
struction permit will be valid for one hundred eighty (180) days and may be
renewed one (1) time without requiring the permit holder to retake and pass
the required knowledge tests for that class of permit, provided the knowl-
edge tests are less than one (1) year old.
(a) Any person under the age of seventeen (17) years who has success-
fully completed an approved driver's training course and has satisfied
the requirements of a class D supervised instruction permit, or any
person who has reached the age of seventeen (17) years, may apply for
a class D instruction permit. Any person applying for any class D in-
struction permit or driving privileges who is under the age of eighteen
(18) years shall be in compliance with school attendance requirements
of section 49-303A, Idaho Code.


(b) If a person reaches the age of seventeen (17) years while operat-
ing a class D vehicle with a class D supervised instruction permit, and
such class D supervised instruction permit becomes a class D instruc-
tion permit as provided in section 49-307, Idaho Code, then such class
D instruction permit shall expire five (5) days after the permittee's
eighteenth birthday.
(c) Any person who has reached the age of eighteen (18) years, holds a
valid Idaho class D driver's license, and has at least one (1) year of
driving experience may apply for a commercial learner's permit.
(d) The department shall not issue a hazardous material endorsement on
any commercial learner's permit.
(2) The department may, at its discretion, issue a temporary class D
driver's license to an applicant for a class D driver's license permitting
him to operate a motor vehicle while the department is completing its inves-
tigation and determination of all facts relative to the applicant's right
to receive a driver's license. The temporary license may be canceled at the
department's discretion at any time after issuance. The temporary license
must be in the applicant's immediate possession while operating a motor ve-
hicle, and it shall be invalid when the applicant's driver's license has been
issued or for good cause has been refused.
(3) A certified copy of an applicant's birth certificate Proof of iden-
tity and citizenship status pursuant to section 49-306(5)(d), Idaho Code,
shall be required before a class D driver's license or class D instruction
permit will be issued.
(4) The department may issue a motorcycle endorsement instruction per-
mit to an applicant who has a valid driver's license and who has success-
fully completed the motorcycle rider's knowledge test and paid the appropri-
ate fees. The permit entitles the applicant, while having the permit in his
immediate possession, to operate a motorcycle upon on the highways for a pe-
riod not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days. The motorcycle endorsement
instruction permit may be renewed one (1) time without the requirement to re-
take and pass the motorcycle rider's knowledge test if the test is less than
one (1) year old. If the permittee passes the skills test for a motorcycle
endorsement within one hundred eighty (180) days of issuance of the motorcy-
cle endorsement instruction permit, he shall not be required to pay the mo-
torcycle endorsement fee. A person holding a motorcycle instruction permit
shall not carry any passenger while operating a motorcycle, shall not oper-
ate a motorcycle except during the hours of daylight only, and shall not op-
erate a motorcycle upon on any interstate highway system. A violation of the
conditions of a motorcycle endorsement instruction permit is an infraction.
The department shall cancel the permit whether or not such violation results
in conviction of the infraction.
SECTION 2. That Section 49-306, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-306. APPLICATION FOR DRIVER'S LICENSE, INSTRUCTION PERMIT,
COMMERCIAL LEARNER'S PERMIT OR RESTRICTED SCHOOL ATTENDANCE DRIVING PER-
MIT. (1) Every application for any instruction permit, restricted school
attendance driving permit, or driver's license shall be made on a form
furnished by the department and shall be verified by the applicant before


a person authorized to administer oaths. Officers and employees of the
department, agents authorized by the department, and sheriffs and their
deputies are authorized to administer the oaths without charge.
(2) Every application for a permit, extension, driver's license, or
knowledge test shall be accompanied by a nonrefundable fee pursuant to this
subsection. Fee portions identified as going to the current expense fund
shall be retained by the issuing entity. If the issuing entity is the depart-
ment or an agent authorized by the department, other than the county, such
fee portion shall be deposited in the state highway account. All other re-
maining fee portions shall be remitted to the state treasurer. If the fee is
collected by a county, all remaining fee portions shall be paid over to the
county treasurer and the county treasurer shall remit such fees to the state
treasurer not less than monthly. The state treasurer shall immediately al-
locate such fees in accordance with the schedule identified following each
fee:
(a) Class A, B, C (4-year) license with endorsements --
age 21 years and older ........................................$40.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $28.00 to the state highway account; and
(v) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(b) Class A, B, C (8-year) license with endorsements --
age 21 years and older ........................................$60.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $8.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $41.00 to the state highway account; and
(v) $2.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(c) Class A, B, C (3-year) license with endorsements --
age 18 to 21 years ............................................$30.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $1.50 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $3.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $19.50 to the state highway account; and
(v) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(d) Class A, B, C (1-year) license with endorsements -- age
20 years ....................................................$15.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $0.50 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $1.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $8.16 to the state highway account; and
(v) $0.34 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(e) Class D (3-year) license -- age 18 to 21 years ..............$30.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $1.50 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $3.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $4.00 to the driver training fund;
(v) $10.50 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;


(f) Class D (1-year) license -- age 17 to 20 years ..............$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $0.50 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $1.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $1.33 to the driver training fund;
(v) $6.83 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $0.34 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(g) Class D (4-year) license -- age 21 years and
older .......................................................$35.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $5.30 to the driver training fund;
(v) $12.70 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $1.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(h) Class D (8-year) or class A, B, C license with
endorsements -- age 21 to 63 years .............................$60.00
(i) $15.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $8.00 to emergency medical services fund III;
(iv) $10.60 to the driver training fund;
(v) $20.40 to the highway distribution account; and
(vi) $2.00 to the motorcycle safety program fund;
(i) Commercial learner's permit ..............................$29.00
(i) $5.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund III; and
(iii) $20.00 to the state highway account;
(j) Class D instruction permit and supervised instruction
permit ......................................................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.60 to the driver training fund; and
(iii) $7.40 to the highway distribution account;
(k) Duplicate driver's license or permit ......................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.60 to the driver training fund; and
(iii) $7.40 to the highway distribution account;
(l) Driver's license extension ...............................$10.00
(i) $2.60 to the driver training account; and
(ii) $7.40 to the state highway account;
(m) License classification change (upgrade)...................$30.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $20.00 to the state highway account;
(n) Endorsement addition ....................................$20.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $10.00 to the state highway account;
(o) Class A, B, C skills tests .................. not more than $200.00
(i) $10.00 to the state highway account; and
(ii) Remainder retained by entity administering the test;
(p) Class D skills test ......................... not more than $35.00
(i) $6.50 to the state highway account; and


(ii) Remainder retained by entity administering the test;
(q) Motorcycle endorsement skills test (amount charged retained by
entity administering the test).................. not more than $25.00;
(r) Knowledge test (fee retained by the entity administering
the test)....................................................$5.00;
(s) Seasonal driver's license ................................$44.00
(i) $10.00 to the current expense fund;
(ii) $2.00 to emergency medical services fund II;
(iii) $4.00 to emergency medical services fund III; and
(iv) $28.00 to the state highway account;
(t) Onetime motorcycle "M" endorsement .......................$15.00
(i) $2.50 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $12.50 to the state highway account;
(u) Motorcycle endorsement instruction permit ................$15.00
(i) $2.50 to the current expense fund; and
(ii) $12.50 to the state highway account;
(v) Restricted driving permit or restricted school attendance
driving permit (fee to the state highway account) .............$60.00.
(3) The fee for any electronic driver's license renewal allowed pur-
suant to section 49-319(10), Idaho Code, shall be five dollars ($5.00) less
than the applicable application fee prescribed in subsection (2) of this
section. This fee reduction shall be accounted for by subtracting five dol-
lars ($5.00) from the portion of fees retained by the department.
(4) A person who applies for a driver's license or a driver's license
renewal may designate a voluntary contribution of two dollars ($2.00) for
the purpose of promoting and supporting organ donation. Such a contribution
shall be treated as a voluntary contribution to the organ donation contribu-
tion fund created in section 49-2447, Idaho Code, and not as a driver's li-
cense fee. Each voluntary contribution shall be deposited into the organ do-
nation contribution fund created in section 49-2447, Idaho Code.
(5) Every application shall state the applicant's true and full name,
date of birth, sex, declaration of Idaho residency, Idaho residence address
and mailing address if different, height, weight, hair color, eye color, and
social security number as verified by the social security administration.
If an applicant has submitted an application pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the applicant may state, in his or
her application pursuant to this section, the applicant's alternative Idaho
mailing address in place of his or her Idaho residence address and mail-
ing address. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 49-303(13), Idaho
Code, an applicant for a nondomiciled class A, B or C driver's license or
nondomiciled commercial learner's permit having residency in a state that
is prohibited from issuing class A, B or C driver's licenses or commercial
learner's permits, as provided in 49 CFR 384, is excepted from providing
proof of Idaho residency and an Idaho mailing address.
(a) The requirement that an applicant provide a social security number
as verified by the social security administration shall apply only to
applicants who have been assigned a social security number.
(b) An applicant who has not been assigned a social security number
shall:


(i) Present written verification from the social security admin-
istration that the applicant has not been assigned a social secu-
rity number; and
(ii) Submit a birth certificate, passport or other documentary
evidence issued by an entity other than a state or the United
States; and
(iii) Submit such proof as the department may require that the ap-
plicant is lawfully present in the United States.
A driver's license, commercial learner's permit or any instruction
permit issued on and after January 1, 1993, shall not contain an appli-
cant's social security number. Applications on file shall be exempt
from disclosure except as provided in sections 49-202, 49-203, 49-203A
and 49-204, Idaho Code.
(c) Every application for a class A, B or C license shall state where the
applicant has been licensed for the preceding ten (10) years and under
which of the following driving categories the applicant will operate:
(i) Non-excepted interstate. The applicant operates or expects
to operate in interstate commerce and is required to provide a med-
ical examiner's certificate;
(ii) Excepted interstate. The applicant operates or expects to
operate in interstate commerce, but engages exclusively in trans-
portation or operations excepted by the federal motor carrier
safety administration from all or parts of the qualification re-
quirements of federal motor carrier safety regulation 49, part
391, and is therefore not required to provide a medical examiner's
certificate;
(iii) Non-excepted intrastate. The applicant operates only in
intrastate commerce and is subject to and meets all Idaho driver
qualification requirements and the applicable parts of federal
motor carrier safety regulation 49, part 391, and is required to
provide a medical examiner's certificate; or
(iv) Excepted intrastate. The applicant operates in intrastate
commerce, but engages exclusively in exempted transportation or
operations as listed in section 67-2901B(2), Idaho Code, and the
applicable parts of federal motor carrier safety regulation 49,
part 391, and is therefore not required to provide a medical exam-
iner's certificate.
All applications shall also state whether the applicant has previously
been licensed as a driver and, if so, when and by what state or country
and whether a driver's license or privileges have ever been suspended,
revoked, denied, disqualified, canceled or refused and, if so, the
date of and reason for the suspension, revocation, denial, disquali-
fication, cancellation or refusal and the applicant's oath that all
information is correct as signified by the applicant's signature.
(d) The applicant must submit proof of identity and citizenship sta-
tus acceptable to the examiner or the department and date of birth as
set forth in a certified copy of his birth certificate. When a certified
copy of his birth certificate or a delayed birth certificate is impossi-
ble to obtain from a vital statistics agency or a valid, unexpired pass-
port. If the applicant does not possess a certified copy of his birth


certificate or a delayed birth certificate and does not possess a valid,
unexpired passport, another government-issued document may be submit-
ted that provides satisfactory evidence of a person's full legal name
and date of birth acceptable to the examiner or the department.
(e) Every applicant for a class A, B or C driver's license or commer-
cial learner's permit shall provide proof of United States citizenship
or lawful permanent residency in the United States upon application for
issuance, transfer, upgrade or renewal, unless the applicant's driving
record already contains documentation confirming United States citi-
zenship or lawful permanent residency. Every applicant for a nondomi-
ciled class A, B or C driver's license or commercial learner's permit
domiciled in a foreign country must provide an unexpired employment au-
thorization document issued by the department of homeland security or
an unexpired foreign passport accompanied by an approved I-94 form doc-
umenting the applicant's most recent admittance into the United States.
(f) Individuals required to register in compliance with section 3 of
the federal military selective service act, 50 U.S.C. App. 451 et seq.,
as amended, shall be provided an opportunity to fulfill such registra-
tion requirements in conjunction with an application for a driver's li-
cense, commercial learner's permit or instruction permit. Any regis-
tration information so supplied shall be transmitted by the department
to the selective service system.
(6) Whenever an application is received from a person previously li-
censed in another jurisdiction, the department shall request a copy of the
driver's record from the other jurisdiction and shall contact the national
driver register. When received, the driver's record from the previous ju-
risdiction shall become a part of the driver's record in this state with the
same force and effect as though entered on the driver's record in this state
in the original instance.
(7) Whenever the department receives a request for a driver's record
from another licensing jurisdiction, the record shall be forwarded without
charge.
(8) The department shall contact and notify the commercial driver li-
cense information system of the proposed application for a class A, B or C
driver's license or commercial learner's permit to ensure identification of
the person and to obtain clearance to issue the license.
(9) The department shall request information from the drug and alco-
hol clearinghouse to determine whether an applicant for any class A, B, or C
driver's license or commercial learner's permit is eligible for the creden-
tial.
(10) A contractor administering a class A, B, or C skills test may col-
lect an additional fee for the use of the contractor's vehicle for the skills
test.
(11) The department may issue seasonal class B or C driver's licenses to
drivers who are employees of agri-chemical businesses, custom harvesters,
farm retail outlets and suppliers, and livestock feeders that:
(a) Will be valid only for driving commercial vehicles that normally
require class B or C commercial driver's licenses;


(b) Will be valid for seasonal periods that begin on the date of is-
suance and that are not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days in a
twelve (12) month period;
(c) May be obtained only twice in a driver's lifetime;
(d) Are valid only within a one-hundred-fifty (150) mile radius of the
place of business or farm being serviced; and
(e) Will be valid only in conjunction with valid Idaho class D driver's
licenses.
(12) The department may issue seasonal class B or C driver's licenses to
drivers who:
(a) Have not violated the single license provisions of applicable fed-
eral regulations;
(b) Have not had any license suspensions, revocations or cancella-
tions;
(c) Have not had any convictions in any vehicle for any offense listed
in section 49-335(1) or (2), Idaho Code, or any one (1) serious traffic
offense;
(d) Have at least one (1) year of driving experience with a class D or
equivalent license in any type of motor vehicle; and
(e) Are at least sixteen (16) years old.
SECTION 3. That Section 49-307, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-307. CLASS D DRIVER'S TRAINING INSTRUCTION PERMIT -- CLASS D SU-
PERVISED INSTRUCTION PERMIT -- APPLICATION FOR A CLASS D DRIVER'S LICENSE
-- RESTRICTIONS ON CLASS D DRIVER'S LICENSE. (1) No enrollee of any class D
driver's training course shall be allowed to attend classes or participate
in driving instruction unless he has obtained a class D driver's training in-
struction permit or a class D instruction permit as provided in subsection
(4) of this section.
(2) Every enrollee of a class D driver's training course shall pay
a nonrefundable fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00), except that a pupil who
participates in parent-student on-road driver's training pursuant to sub-
section (7) of this section shall pay a nonrefundable fee of ten dollars
($10.00). Five dollars ($5.00) of each fee so imposed shall be deposited in
the state highway account and five dollars ($5.00) shall be deposited in the
county current expense fund. The additional five dollars ($5.00) for every
class D driver's training course enrollee shall be:
(a) Deposited in the driver training account if the person is taking
driver's training from a public school; or
(b) Paid to the division of occupational and professional licenses
and deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the occupational
licenses fund if the person is taking driver's training from a private
driver's training program. The amount to be remitted to the division
of occupational and professional licenses shall be annually calculated
and paid. To calculate such amount, the total number of public driver's
training students as submitted to the state department of education
shall be subtracted from the total number of permits sold as reported by
the Idaho transportation department, and the resulting number shall be
multiplied by five dollars ($5.00).


(3) Each enrollee of a class D driver's training course shall provide
the type of information required for a driver's license or instruction per-
mit. If an enrollee of a class D driver's training course cannot provide a
certified copy of his birth certificate at the time of application for a per-
mit, the department may issue a class D driver's training instruction permit
or a class D instruction permit upon receipt of identification acceptable to
the department. The certified copy of an applicant's birth certificate or
another government-issued identity document and documentation to establish
the applicant's relationship to a person who is willing to assume responsi-
bility for such applicant shall be required before a class D driver's license
will be issued.
(4) The class D driver's training instruction permit shall expire five
(5) days after the permittee's eighteenth birthday for permittees fourteen
and one-half (14 1/2) years of age through seventeen and one-half (17 1/2)
years of age. The class D driver's training instruction permit shall ex-
pire one hundred eighty (180) days from the date of issue for persons sev-
enteen and one-half (17 1/2) years of age or older. Persons aged seventeen
(17) years or older may attend classes or participate in driver's training
instruction while operating with a class D instruction permit or a class D
driver's training instruction permit.
(5) The class D driver's training instruction permit shall be issued to
the instructor of the course or to the qualifying parent or legal guardian
pursuant to subsection (7) of this section.
(6) Class D supervised instruction permit.
(a) Upon successful completion of the class D driver's training course,
the driver's training instructor shall submit the student log to the
county driver's license office and give the class D driver's training
instruction permit to the parent or legal guardian of the permittee, and
the parent or legal guardian shall assume responsibility for ensuring
that the permittee complies with the requirements of operating a vehi-
cle with a class D supervised instruction permit. The class D driver's
training instruction permit shall then serve as a class D supervised
instruction permit.
(b) In the event the permittee reaches the age of seventeen (17) years
while operating a class D vehicle with a class D supervised instruction
permit, the supervised instruction permit shall become a class D in-
struction permit.
(7)(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
pupils eligible for driver's training pursuant to section 33-1703,
Idaho Code, may receive driver's training instruction from a qualifying
parent or legal guardian. The driver's training provided for in this
subsection shall be known as parent-student on-road driver's training.
A parent or legal guardian qualifies to provide parent-student on-road
driver's training pursuant to this subsection as long as:
(i) The parent or legal guardian possesses a valid Idaho driver's
license that permits unaccompanied driving;
(ii) The parent or legal guardian has not had a license suspended,
revoked, or canceled and has not been disqualified from holding an
Idaho driver's license for the previous two (2) years. A parent or
legal guardian shall no longer be qualified if a license becomes


suspended, revoked, or canceled or if a parent or legal guardian
becomes disqualified from holding an Idaho driver's license dur-
ing the student's education; and
(iii) The parent or legal guardian and the student live in a rural
school district as defined by section 33-319, Idaho Code, or in a
school district that does not offer driver education courses.
(b) Parent-student on-road driver's training shall include ninety-two
(92) total hours, over a period of no less than six (6) months, of
on-road driver's training provided to the student, including:
(i) No less than fifty (50) hours of street or highway driving;
and
(ii) No less than ten (10) hours of driving after sunset or before
sunrise.
(c) A qualifying parent or legal guardian who provides parent-student
on-road driver's training pursuant to this subsection shall maintain
and submit a log to the county driver's license office at the completion
of the student's training. The log shall include the dates the lessons
were conducted and details regarding what was included in the lesson.
(d) A student may receive parent-student on-road driver's training
from more than one (1) qualifying parent or legal guardian.
(e) The parent or legal guardian must teach the student the accepted
Idaho driver's education curriculum. The student must enroll and
successfully complete the Idaho digital learning alliance driver ed-
ucation online class, which is aligned to the state department of
education's driver education online content requirements. IDLA shall
make the online class available to any public or nonpublic student in
the state of Idaho who wishes to enroll in such class to fulfill the re-
quirements of this subsection.
(f) A student must meet the requirements of subsection (8) of this sec-
tion before applying for a class D driver's license.
(8) No permittee may apply for a class D driver's license sooner than
fifteen (15) years of age and no sooner than six (6) months after completing a
class D driver's training course, during which time the permittee shall sat-
isfy all requirements for operation of a class D vehicle with a class D super-
vised instruction permit as follows:
(a) The permittee shall not operate a vehicle unless he is accompanied
by a driver who holds a valid driver's license, is twenty-one (21) years
of age or older, and is actually occupying a seat beside the permittee
driver. The supervising driver and the permittee shall be the only oc-
cupants of the front passenger section of the vehicle.
(b) Over a period of time not less than six (6) months, the permittee
shall accumulate at least fifty (50) hours of supervised driving time,
ten (10) hours of which shall be during hours of darkness.
(c) The permit shall be in the permittee's immediate possession at all
times while operating a vehicle.
(d) In addition to the permittee driver and the supervising driver, all
other occupants of the vehicle shall wear a seat belt or be restrained by
child passenger restraints as required by law.
(e) The permittee is subject to the provisions of sections 18-1502 and
18-8004, Idaho Code, relating to violation of age restrictions on con-


sumption of beer, wine, and alcohol and driving under the influence of
alcohol, drugs or any other intoxicating substances, respectively.
(f) The permittee shall not have been convicted of any moving traffic
violation, have had driving privileges suspended by the department or
the court for any offense, or have been found to be in violation of any
of the restrictions on the class D supervised instruction permit for a
period of at least six (6) months from the date the driver's training in-
structor gave the permit to the parent or legal guardian, or from the
date a canceled class D supervised instruction permit was reissued, or
until the permittee reaches seventeen (17) years of age.
(g) If the permittee is under seventeen (17) years of age and is con-
victed of a violation of any traffic law, or section 18-1502, 18-8004
or 23-949, Idaho Code, or is found to be in violation of any of the re-
strictions on the class D supervised instruction permit, the department
shall cancel the class D supervised instruction permit, and the cancel-
lation shall not be used to establish rates of motor vehicle insurance
charged by a casualty insurer. If the permittee is under seventeen (17)
years of age, the permittee may reapply for and be issued a new class D
supervised instruction permit upon payment of the appropriate fee and
shall again be required to operate with the class D supervised instruc-
tion permit for at least six (6) months from the date of reissue with-
out a conviction or suspension, accumulate the required hours of driv-
ing time, and adhere to the requirements as specified in paragraphs (a)
through (f) of this subsection.
(9) Upon completion of the requirements in subsection (8) of this sec-
tion, the permittee shall take the knowledge test and skills test adminis-
tered by a person certified by the Idaho transportation department to admin-
ister knowledge and skills tests.
(10)(a) Upon passage of the knowledge and skills tests, the permittee
may apply for a class D driver's license with driving privileges re-
stricted to daylight hours only for persons under sixteen (16) years of
age and with full privileges at sixteen (16) years of age or older.
(b) For purposes of this subsection, "daylight hours only" means the
period of time between 5:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m. local time.
(c) The restriction on daylight hours only driving privileges for per-
sons under sixteen (16) years of age shall not apply if:
(i) The person under sixteen (16) years of age has a valid class D
driver's license;
(ii) The person under sixteen (16) years of age is accompanied by
a driver who holds a valid driver's license and is twenty-one (21)
years of age or older and is actually occupying a seat beside the
licensee who is under sixteen (16) years of age; and
(iii) The two (2) licensed drivers are the only occupants of the
front passenger section of the vehicle.
(11) Upon passage of the knowledge and skills tests, the permittee may
apply for a class D driver's license. Any such licensee who is under the age
of seventeen (17) years shall be required, during the first six (6) months
from the date of issue of the class D driver's license, to limit the number
of passengers in the vehicle who are under the age of seventeen (17) years to
not more than one (1) such passenger. Provided however, the limit of one (1)


passenger under the age of seventeen (17) years shall not apply to passengers
who are related to the driver by blood, adoption or marriage.
SECTION 4. That Section 49-318, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-318. DUPLICATE DRIVER LICENSES AND SUBSTITUTE PERMITS. (1) The
holder of any instruction permit, class A, B, C or D, restricted school
attendance driving permit, or seasonal driver's license which is lost or
destroyed, or a licensee whose name is legally changed, may apply for a du-
plicate driver's license or substitute permit. A duplicate driver's license
or substitute permit will be issued upon:
(a) Payment of the fee as provided in section 49-306, Idaho Code;
(b) Furnishing satisfactory proof that the permit, class A, B, C or D,
restricted school attendance driving permit, or seasonal driver's li-
cense has been lost or destroyed, or that the licensee's name has been
legally changed; and
(c) Furnishing proof of the applicant's identity acceptable to the
examiner or the department and date of birth as set forth in a certi-
fied copy of his birth certificate when obtainable, or another document
which that provides evidence of a person's date of birth acceptable to
the examiner or department. In the case of a name change, the applicant
shall provide legal documentation acceptable to the department to ver-
ify the change.
(2) A duplicate driver's license or substitute permit shall not be is-
sued, as provided in subsection (1) of this section, if the license or permit
is suspended, revoked, canceled or disqualified in this state or any other
jurisdiction or if the applicant has applied for, or has been issued, a li-
cense or permit in another jurisdiction.
(3) The holder of any instruction permit, class A, B, C or D, restricted
school attendance driving permit, or seasonal driver's license who requests
a duplicate driver's license or substitute permit as provided in subsection
(1) of this section, may request that the notation "permanently disabled" be
imprinted on the permit or license and the department shall imprint "perma-
nently disabled" on the permit or license if:
(a) The person has a permanent disability; and
(b) The person presents written certification from a licensed physi-
cian verifying that the person's stated impairment qualifies as a per-
manent disability as provided in section 49-117, Idaho Code; and
(c) The department determines that the person meets the requirements
for issuance of a permit or license as specified in section 49-313,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 5. That Section 49-2443, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-2443. APPLICATION. Application for an identification card must be
made in person before an authorized agent of the department. The authorized
agent shall obtain the following from the applicant:
(1) The true and full name and Idaho residence address and mailing ad-
dress, if different, of the applicant;


(2) The identity and date of birth of the applicant as set forth in a
certified copy of his birth certificate pursuant to section 49-2444(6),
Idaho Code, and, subject to subsection (6) of this section, other satis-
factory evidence of identity acceptable to the authorized agent or the
department;
(3) The height and weight of the applicant;
(4) The color of eyes and hair of the applicant;
(5) The applicant's signature; and
(6) The applicant's social security number as verified by the social
security administration.
(a) The requirement that an applicant provide a social security number
as verified by the social security administration shall apply only to
applicants who have been assigned a social security number.
(b) An applicant who has not been assigned a social security number
shall:
(i) Present written verification from the social security admin-
istration that the applicant has not been assigned a social secu-
rity number; and
(ii) Submit a birth certificate, passport or other documentary
evidence issued by an entity other than a state or the United
States; and
(iii) Submit such proof as the department may require that the ap-
plicant is lawfully present in the United States.
SECTION 6. That Section 49-2444, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
49-2444. IDENTIFICATION CARD ISSUED -- FOUR-YEAR OR EIGHT-YEAR. (1)
The department shall issue a distinguishing identification card that sets
forth the information contained in the application in a form as prescribed
by the department. All identification cards issued on or after January 1,
1993, shall not contain the applicant's social security number. An appli-
cant's social security number shall be exempt from disclosure except for in-
quiries from agencies or institutions authorized to obtain such information
by federal law or regulation, from peace officers, or from jury commission-
ers. Each card shall have printed on it the applicant's full name, date of
birth, Idaho residence address, sex, weight, height, eye color, and hair
color and shall include a distinguishing number assigned to the applicant.
If an applicant has submitted an application pursuant to the provisions of
chapter 58, title 19, Idaho Code, then the applicant's identification card
shall contain his or her alternative Idaho mailing address in place of his or
her Idaho residence address. Each card shall also have printed on it the name
of this state, the date of issuance, and the date of expiration. An identifi-
cation card shall not be valid until it has been signed on the signature line
by the applicant. Each card shall include a color photograph of the appli-
cant, which shall be taken by the examiner at the time of application. The
photograph shall be taken without headgear or other clothing or device that
disguises or otherwise conceals the face or head of the applicant. A waiver
may be granted by the department allowing the applicant to wear headgear or
other head covering for medical, religious or safety purposes as long as the
face is not disguised or otherwise concealed. At the request of the appli-


cant, an identification card may contain a statement or indication of the
medical condition of the applicant.
(2) No person shall receive an identification card unless and until he
surrenders to the department all identification cards in his possession is-
sued to him by Idaho or any other jurisdiction, or any driver's license is-
sued by any other jurisdiction within the United States, or until he executes
an affidavit that he does not possess an identification card or any driver's
license.
(3) Identification cards issued to persons under eighteen (18) years of
age shall include a notation "under 18 until (month, day, year)," and iden-
tification cards issued to persons eighteen (18) years of age to twenty-one
(21) years of age shall include a notation "under 21 until (month, day,
year)." The nonrefundable fee for a four (4) year identification card issued
to persons twenty-one (21) years of age or older shall be fifteen dollars
($15.00), of which ten dollars ($10.00) shall be retained by the county
and credited to the current expense fund and five dollars ($5.00) shall be
deposited in the state treasury to the credit of the highway distribution
account. The nonrefundable fee for identification cards issued to persons
under twenty-one (21) years of age shall be ten dollars ($10.00), of which
five dollars ($5.00) shall be retained by the authorized issuing agent or,
if issued by the county, shall be credited to the current expense fund and
five dollars ($5.00) shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit
of the highway distribution account. The nonrefundable fee for an eight (8)
year identification card shall be twenty-five dollars ($25.00), of which
fifteen dollars ($15.00) shall be retained by the authorized issuing agent
or, if issued by the county, shall be credited to the current expense fund and
ten dollars ($10.00) shall be deposited in the state treasury to the credit
of the highway distribution account. At the option of the applicant, the
identification card issued to a person twenty-one (21) years of age or older
shall expire either on the card holder's birthday in the fourth year or the
eighth year following issuance of the card, except as otherwise provided
in subsection (7) of this section. Every identification card issued to a
person under eighteen (18) years of age shall expire five (5) days after the
person's eighteenth birthday, except as otherwise provided in subsection
(7) of this section. Every identification card issued to a person eighteen
(18) years of age but under twenty-one (21) years of age shall expire five (5)
days after the person's twenty-first birthday, except as otherwise provided
in subsection (7) of this section.
(4) Individuals required to register in compliance with section 3
of the federal military selective service act, 50 U.S.C. 451 et seq., as
amended, shall be provided an opportunity to fulfill such registration re-
quirements in conjunction with an application for an identification card.
Any registration information so supplied shall be transmitted by the depart-
ment to the selective service system.
(5) Every identification card, except those issued to persons under
twenty-one (21) years of age, shall be renewable on or before its expiration,
but not more than twenty-five (25) months before, and upon application and
payment of the required fee.
(6) The applicant for an identification card must submit proof of iden-
tity and citizenship status acceptable to the examiner or the department and


date of birth as set forth in a certified copy of his birth certificate. When
a certified copy of his birth certificate or a delayed birth certificate is
impossible to obtain from a vital statistics agency or a valid, unexpired
passport. If the applicant does not possess a certified copy of his birth
certificate or a delayed birth certificate and does not possess a valid,
unexpired passport, another government-issued document may be submitted
that provides satisfactory evidence of a person's full legal name and date of
birth acceptable to the examiner or the department.
(7) Every identification card issued to a person who is a citizen of the
United States shall, where possible, include the notation "USA." Every iden-
tification card issued to a person who is not a citizen or permanent legal
resident of the United States shall have an expiration date that is the same
date as the end of lawful stay in the United States as indicated on documents
issued and verified by the department of homeland security; however, the ex-
piration date shall not extend beyond the expiration date for the same cate-
gory of identification card issued to citizens. Persons whose department of
homeland security documents do not state an expiration date shall be issued
an identification card with an expiration date of one (1) year from the date
of issuance.
(8) When an identification card has been expired for less than twenty-
five (25) months, the renewal of the identification card shall start from
the original date of expiration, regardless of the year in which the applica-
tion for renewal is made. If the identification card is expired for more than
twenty-five (25) months, the application shall expire, at the option of the
applicant, on the applicant's birthday in the fourth year or the eighth year
following reissuance of the identification card, except as otherwise pro-
vided in subsection (7) of this section.
(9)(a) If an Idaho identification card has expired or will expire and
the identification card holder is temporarily out of state, except
on active military duty, the identification card holder may request
in writing on a form prescribed by the department an extension of the
identification card. The request shall be accompanied by the fee
fixed in section 49-306, Idaho Code, and the extension shall be no more
than a twelve (12) month period. If the department determines that an
extension of the identification card is necessary, it may issue an iden-
tification card showing the date to which the expired identification
card is extended. Identification card extensions are limited to two (2)
consecutive extensions per identification card holder.
(b) Upon returning to the state of Idaho, the identification card
holder shall, within ten (10) days, apply for a renewal of the expired
identification card and surrender the extended identification card and
the expired identification card.
(10) An Idaho identification card issued to any person prior to serving
on active duty in the armed forces of the United States, or a member of the
immediate family accompanying such a person, if valid and in full force and
effect upon entering active duty, shall remain in full force and effect and
shall, upon application, be extended for a period of four (4) years as long
as active duty continues, and the identification card shall remain in full
force and effect sixty (60) days following the date the card holder is re-
leased from active duty.


(11) A person possessing an identification card who desires to donate
any or all organs or tissue in the event of death, and who has completed a
document of gift pursuant to the provisions for donation of anatomical gifts
as set forth in chapter 34, title 39, Idaho Code, may, at the option of the
donor, indicate this desire on the identification card by the imprinting of
the word "donor" on the identification card. The provisions of this subsec-
tion shall apply to persons possessing an identification card who are fif-
teen (15) years of age or older but less than eighteen (18) years of age if
the requirements provided in chapter 34, title 39, Idaho Code, have been com-
plied with.
(12) A person possessing an identification card or an applicant for an
identification card who is a person with a permanent disability may request
that the notation "permanently disabled" be imprinted on the identification
card, provided the person presents written certification from a licensed
physician verifying that the person's stated impairment qualifies as a per-
manent disability according to the provisions of section 49-117, Idaho Code.
(13) A person who is a veteran may request that his or her status as such
be designated on an identification card at no additional cost. Any such re-
quest shall be accompanied by proof of being a current or former member of
the United States armed forces. Upon request and submission of satisfactory
proof, the department shall indicate such person's status as a veteran on any
identification card issued pursuant to the provisions of this section. Such
designation shall be made upon original issuance or renewal of an identifi-
cation card. Designation shall also be made on any duplicate identification
card issued, provided that the fee for such duplicate card is paid in accor-
dance with this section.
(14) Satisfactory proof of being a current or former member of the
United States armed forces must be furnished by an applicant to the de-
partment before a designation of veteran status will be indicated on any
identification card. Acceptable proof shall be a copy of form DD214 or an
equivalent document or statement from the department of veterans affairs
that identifies a character of service upon separation as "honorable" or
"general under honorable conditions."
(15) In the case of a name change, the applicant shall provide legal doc-
umentation to verify the change in accordance with department rules.
(16) Whenever any person, after applying for or receiving an identifi-
cation card, moves from the address shown on the application or on the iden-
tification card issued, that person shall, within thirty (30) days, notify
the transportation department in writing of the old and new addresses.
(17) The department shall cancel any identification card upon determin-
ing that the person was not entitled to the issuance of the identification
card or that the person failed to give the required and correct information
in his application or committed fraud in making the application. Upon can-
cellation, the person shall surrender the canceled identification card to
the department.
(18) If any person shall fail to return to the department the identifi-
cation card as required, the department may direct any peace officer to se-
cure its possession and return the identification card to the department.
(19) The department may issue a no-fee identification card to an indi-
vidual whose driver's license has been canceled and voluntarily surrendered


as provided in section 49-322(5), Idaho Code. The identification card may be
renewed at no cost to the applicant as long as the driver's license remains
canceled.
(20) It is an infraction for any person to fail to notify the department
of a change of address as required by the provisions of subsection (16) of
this section.
(21) The department may issue an initial four (4) year no-fee identifi-
cation card to an individual who is homeless. The department shall establish
a form for verification of homelessness pursuant to this section. Such form
shall require the signature of an outreach worker or service worker verify-
ing that the individual is homeless and attesting to the individual's resi-
dency at an Idaho relief agency or shelter. An applicant issued an identifi-
cation card under the provisions of this subsection shall be entitled to one
(1) free replacement. Subsequent replacements and renewals of this identi-
fication card will be subject to the fees imposed in this section.
(22) The department shall issue a four (4) year no-fee identification
card to any individual eighteen (18) years of age or older who indicates on
the application that an identification card is needed to comply with voter
registration or voting requirements. An applicant issued an identification
card under this subsection shall be entitled to one (1) free replacement.
Such applicants are entitled to no-fee renewals as long as the applicant
meets the requirements of this subsection at the time of renewal.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.